Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3526
Paraplegic, multiple amputee; terms, defined.

As used in sections 77-3526 to 77-3528:

(1) Paraplegic shall mean a veteran who is paralyzed in both legs such as to preclude locomotion without the aid of braces, crutches, canes, or wheelchair;

(2) Multiple amputee shall mean a veteran who has undergone amputation of (a) either both lower extremities or one lower extremity and one upper extremity, such as to preclude locomotion without the aid of braces, crutches, canes, wheelchair, or artificial limbs, or (b) both upper extremities;

(3) Home shall mean one housing unit and necessary land therefor not to exceed one acre occupied by the veteran or his or her unmarried surviving spouse when the veteran or surviving spouse is the owner of record from January 1 through August 15 in each year; and

(4) Substantially contributed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall mean any amount received by a veteran from the department under Public Law 85-857 adopted September 2, 1958, as amended and in effect on January 1, 1979.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 26;

Laws 1987, LB 376A, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 2, § 19;

Laws 2004, LB 986, § 1.